Mississippi statutes. Title 23. Elections
Subarticle A. Qualification of Electors.

§ 23-15-11.
Qualifications, generally.

Every inhabitant of this state, except persons adjudicated to be non compos mentis, who is a citizen of the United States of America, eighteen (18) years old and upwards, who has resided in this state for thirty (30) days and for thirty (30) days in the county in which he or she seeks to vote, and for thirty (30) days in the incorporated municipality in which he or she seeks to vote, and who has been duly registered as an elector under Section 23-15-33, and who has never been convicted of vote fraud or of any crime listed in Section 241, Mississippi Constitution of 1890, shall be a qualified elector in and for the county, municipality and voting precinct of his or her residence, and shall be entitled to vote at any election upon compliance with Section 23-15-563. If the thirtieth day to register before an election falls on a Sunday or legal holiday, the registration applications submitted on the business day immediately following the Sunday or legal holiday shall be accepted and entered in the Statewide Elections Management System for the purpose of enabling voters to vote in the next election. Any person who will be eighteen (18) years of age or older on or before the date of the general election and who is duly registered to vote not less than thirty (30) days before the primary election associated with the general election, may vote in the primary election even though the person has not reached his or her eighteenth birthday at the time that the person seeks to vote at the primary election. No others than those specified in this section shall be entitled, or shall be allowed, to vote at any election.

HISTORY:
Derived from 1972 Code §21-11-1 [Codes, 1892, § 3028; 1906, § 3433; Hemingway’s 1917, § 5993; 1930, § 2595; 1942, § 3374-60; Laws, 1950, ch. 491, § 60; Laws, 1984, ch. 457, § 2; repealed by Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 329], §23-3-11 [Codes, 1942, § 3160; Laws, 1935, ch. 19; Laws, 1936, ch. 320; Laws, 1955 Ex ch. 100, § 2; repealed by Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 333], and §23-3-85 [Codes, 1892, § 3631; 1906, § 4138; Hemingway’s 1917, § 6772; 1930, § 6207; 1942, § 3235; Laws, 1952, ch. 398, § 2; Laws, 1955, Ex Sess, ch. 101; Laws, 1962, ch. 575; Laws, 1965 Ex Sess, ch. 18, § 1; repealed by Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 335]; en, Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 2; Laws, 1997, ch. 315, § 1; Laws, 2000, ch. 430, § 2; Laws, 2008, ch. 442, § 10; Laws, 2012, ch. 517, § 1; Laws, 2012, ch. 526, § 4; Laws, 2017, ch. 441, § 171, eff from and after July 1, 2017.

§ 23-15-13.
Change of residency to new ward or voting precinct within same municipality.

An elector who moves from one (1) ward or voting precinct to another ward within the same municipality or voting precinct within the same county shall not be disqualified to vote, but he or she shall be entitled to have his or her registration transferred to his or her new ward or voting precinct upon making written request therefor at any time up to thirty (30) days before the election at which he or she offers to vote, and if the removal occurs within thirty (30) days of such election he or she shall be entitled to vote in his or her new ward or voting precinct by affidavit ballot as provided in Section 23-15-573. If the thirtieth day to transfer the elector’s registration before an election falls on a Sunday or legal holiday, the transfer of the elector’s registration submitted on the business day immediately following the Sunday or legal holiday shall be accepted and entered into the Statewide Elections Management System for the purpose of enabling voters to vote in the next election.

If an elector requests a change in his or her address under Section 23-15-49 and the address is located in a precinct in the county or municipality that differs from the precinct as reflected in the then current registration records, the request shall be treated in the same manner as a written request to transfer the elector’s registration under subsection (1) of this section.

HISTORY:
Derived from 1972 Code §21-11-1 [Codes, 1892, § 3028; 1906, § 3433; Hemingway’s 1917, § 5993; 1930, § 2595; 1942, § 3374-60; Laws, 1950, ch. 491, § 60; repealed by Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 329]; en, Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 3; Laws, 2000, ch. 430, § 3; Laws, 2016, ch. 416, § 2; Laws, 2017, ch. 441, § 188, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 18, 2017).

§ 23-15-14.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 2004, ch. 305, § 17, eff from and after July 12, 2004, the date said ch. 305 was effectuated under Section 5 of the Voting Rights Act of 1965.

[Laws, 1988, ch. 350, § 1, eff from and after November 29, 1988 (the date the United States Attorney General interposed no objection to the codification of this section).]

§ 23-15-15.
Documentation required of naturalized citizens.

It shall be the duty of any person who has acquired citizenship by order or decree of naturalization and who is otherwise qualified to register and vote under the laws of the State of Mississippi to present or exhibit to the registrar of the county of his or her residence, at or before the time he or she may offer to register, a certified copy of the final order or decree of naturalization, or a certificate of naturalization or duplicate thereof, or a certified copy of such certificate of naturalization or duplicate; otherwise he or she shall not be allowed to register or to vote.

HISTORY:
Derived from 1972 Code §23-5-39 [Codes, 1930, § 6188; 1942, § 3216; Laws, 1924, ch. 154; Laws, 1934, ch. 310; repealed by Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 335]; en, Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 4; Laws, 2017, ch. 441, § 4, eff from and after July 1, 2017.

§ 23-15-17.
Reporting and investigation of false registration.

Any person who has reasonable cause to suspect that a false registration as provided in Section 97-13-25 has occurred may notify any authorized law enforcement officer with proper jurisdiction. Upon such notification, law enforcement officer shall be required to conduct an investigation into the matter and file a report with the registrar and the appropriate district attorney. The registrar shall, within twenty-four (24) hours of receipt of the investigating officer’s report, accept or reject the registration. Any person who so notifies an authorized law enforcement officer shall be presumed to be acting in good faith and shall be immune from any liability, civil or criminal, that might otherwise be incurred or imposed.

HISTORY:
Derived from 1972 Code §23-5-43 [Codes, 1880, § 113; 1892, § 3616; 1906, § 4123; Hemingway’s 1917, § 6757; 1930, § 6190; 1942, § 3218; repealed by Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 335]; en. Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 5; Laws, 1991 of ch. 440, § 4; Laws, 2017, ch. 441, § 172, eff from and after July 1, 2017.

§ 23-15-19.
Persons convicted of certain crimes not to be registered.

Any person who has been convicted of vote fraud or any crime listed in Section 241, Mississippi Constitution of 1890, such crimes defined as “disenfranchising,” shall not be registered, or if registered the name of the person shall be removed from the Statewide Elections Management System by the registrar or the election commissioners of the county of his or her residence. Whenever any person shall be convicted in the circuit court of his or her county of a disenfranchising crime, the county registrar shall thereupon remove his or her name from the Statewide Elections Management System; and whenever any person shall be convicted of a disenfranchising crime in any other court of any county, the presiding judge of the court shall, on demand, certify the fact in writing to the registrar of the county in which the voter resides, who shall thereupon remove the name of the person from the Statewide Elections Management System and retain the certificate as a record of his or her office.

HISTORY:
Derived from 1972 Code §23-5-35 [Codes 1871, § 343; 1880, § 108; 1892, § 3614; 1906, § 4120; Hemingway’s 1917, § 6754; 1930, § 6186; 1942, § 3214; repealed by Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 335]; en, Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 6; Laws, 2012, ch. 517, § 2; Laws, 2017, ch. 441, § 5, eff from and after July 1, 2017.

§ 23-15-21.
Non-citizen not to register or vote.

It shall be unlawful for any person who is not a citizen of the United States or the State of Mississippi to register or to vote in any primary, special or general election in the state.

HISTORY:
Derived from 1972 Code §23-5-41 [Codes, 1930, § 6189; 1942, § 3217; Laws, 1924, ch. 154; repealed by Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 335]; en, Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 7, eff from and after January 1, 1987.